Washington statutes.
RCW 39.32.020

Acquisition of surplus property authorized.

The director of enterprise services is hereby authorized to purchase, lease or otherwise acquire from federal, state, or local government or any surplus property disposal agency thereof surplus property to be used in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2015 c 225 s 42; 1995 c 137 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 135 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 70 s 2; 1945 c 205 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-61.]

NOTES:

Authority of superintendent of public instruction to acquire federal surplus or donated food commodities for school district hot lunch program: Chapter 28A.235 RCW.